Utah statutes.
20A-7-513.   Fiscal review -- Repeal, amendment, or resubmission.

(1)  No later than 60 days after the date of an election in which the voters approve an initiative petition, the budget officer shall:

(a)  for each initiative approved by the voters, prepare a final fiscal impact statement, using current financial information and containing the information required by Subsection 20A-7-502.5(2); and

(b)  deliver a copy of the final fiscal impact statement to:

(i)  the local legislative body of the jurisdiction where the initiative was circulated;

(ii)  the local clerk; and

(iii)  the first five sponsors listed on the initiative application.

(2)  If the final fiscal impact statement exceeds the initial fiscal impact estimate by 25% or more, the local legislative body shall review the final fiscal impact statement and may, by a majority vote:

(a)  repeal the law established by passage of the initiative;

(b)  amend the law established by the passage of the initiative; or

(c)  pass a resolution informing the voters that they may file an initiative petition to repeal the law enacted by the passage of the initiative.

